Alaska, session 34, SB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.08.041 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (g) Notwithstanding AS 14.14.140, a member of a regional school board may 06 be employed as a substitute teacher at a school. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 14.12.080 is amended to read: 08 Sec. 14.12.080. Qualification of members. To be eligible to be a member of a 09 school board, a person must have the same qualifications as are necessary to be a 10 municipal voter in the school district and may not have been convicted of any crime 11 that constitutes a felony under state or federal law, including a felony for which 12 the person has been unconditionally discharged. In this section, "unconditionally 13 discharged" has the meaning given in AS 12.73.090. 14 * Sec. 3. AS 14.14.140 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 01 (d) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a member of a school board may be 02 employed as a substitute teacher at a school. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.